Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB256.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 9 of this Act:
(1) "Marketable record title" means a title of record as described in Section 2 of this
Act that operates to extinguish interest and claims existing before the effective
date of the root of title, as provided in Section 4 of this Act;
(2) "Mineral" means gas; oil; coal; coalbed methane gas; other gaseous, liquid, and
solid hydrocarbons; sand; gravel; clay; shale; gypsum; halite; limestone;
dolomite; sandstone; other stone; metalliferous or nonmetalliferous ore; or
another material or substance of commercial value that is excavated in a solid
state from natural depositions on or in the earth;
(3) "Mineral interest" or "mineral estate" means a fee interest in at least one (1)
mineral regardless of how the interest is created and of the form of the interest,
which may be absolute, whole, fractional, divided, or undivided;
(4) "Muniments" means the records of title transactions in the chain of title of a
person that:
(a) Purport to create the interest in land claimed by the person; and
(b) Upon which the person relies as a basis for the marketability of the person's
title;
commencing with the root of title and including all subsequent transactions;
(5) "Person dealing with land" means a:
(a) Purchaser of an estate or interest in an estate;
(b) Mortgagee;
(c) Levying or attaching creditor;
(d) Land contract vendee; or
Page 1 of 8
HB025610.100 - 854 - XXXX 2/20/2025 2:36 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 256/GA
(e) Person seeking to:
1. Acquire an estate or interest in an estate; or
2. Impose a lien on an estate;
(6) "Recording," when applied to official public records of any court, includes filing;
(7) "Records" means all official public records that affect title to land and includes
probate records and records in the office of the county clerk of the county in
which all or part of the land is located;
(8) "Root of title" means that title transaction in the chain of the title of a person:
(a) That purports to create the interest claimed by the person;
(b) Upon which the person relies as a basis for the marketability of the person's
title;
(c) That is the most recent to be recorded as of a date at least forty (40) years
prior to the time when marketability is being determined; and
(d) The effective date of the root of title is the date on which it is recorded; and
(9) "Title transaction" means any transaction affecting title to any interest in land,
including title by:
(a) Will or descent;
(b) Tax deed;
(c) Trustee's, referee's, guardian's, executor's, administrator's, commissioner's,
or sheriff's deed;
(d) Decree of a court; or
(e) Warranty deed, quitclaim deed, or mortgage.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Any person having the legal capacity to own land in this state who has an unbroken
chain of title of record to an interest in land for at least forty (40) years has a
marketable record title to that interest, subject to Section 3 of this Act. A person is
Page 2 of 8
HB025610.100 - 854 - XXXX 2/20/2025 2:36 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 256/GA
considered to have this unbroken chain of title when:
(1) The official public records disclose a conveyance or other title transaction of
record that occurred at least forty (40) years before the time the marketability is
determined; and
(2) The conveyance or other title transaction purports to create an interest in:
(a) The person claiming the interest; or
(b) A person from whom, by one (1) or more title transactions of record, the
purported interest has become vested in the person claiming the interest;
with nothing appearing of record in either case purporting to divest the claimant
of the purported interest.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Marketable record title shall be subject to:
(1) All interests and defects that are inherent in the muniments of which the chain of
record title is formed, provided that:
(a) A general reference in the muniments, or any one (1) of them, to:
1. Easements;
2. Use restrictions; or
3. Other interests created before the root of title;
shall not be sufficient to preserve them, unless specific identification is
made in the muniments of a recorded title transaction that creates the
easement, use restriction, or other interest; and
(b) Possibilities of reverter, and rights of entry or powers of termination for
breach of condition subsequent, which interests are inherent in the
muniments of which the chain of record title is formed and which have
existed for forty (40) years or more, shall be preserved and remain effective
only in the manner provided in Section 5 of this Act;
Page 3 of 8
HB025610.100 - 854 - XXXX 2/20/2025 2:36 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 256/GA
(2) All interests preserved by:
(a) Filing proper notice; or
(b) Possession by the same owner continuously for at least forty (40) years, in
accordance with Section 5 of this Act;
(3) The rights of any person arising from adverse possession or adverse user, if the
period of adverse possession or adverse user was in whole or in part subsequent
to the effective date of the root of title;
(4) Any interest arising out of a title transaction recorded after the effective date of
the root of title from which the unbroken chain of title of record is started,
provided the recording shall not revive or give validity to any interest that has
been before the time of the recording by the operation of Section 4 of this Act;
and
(5) The exceptions stated in Section 7 of this Act.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Subject to Section 3 of this Act, marketable record title is held by its owner and shall be
taken by a person dealing with the land free and clear of all interests, claims, or
charges the existence of which depends upon any act, transaction, event, or omission
that occurred before the effective date of the root of title. All of these interests, claims,
or charges, however denominated, whether:
(1) Legal or equitable;
(2) Present or future; or
(3) Asserted by a person:
(a) Who has full capacity to act on his or her own behalf or under a disability;
(b) Within or outside the state;
(c) Natural or corporate; or
(d) Private or governmental;
Page 4 of 8
HB025610.100 - 854 - XXXX 2/20/2025 2:36 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 256/GA
are void.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person claiming an interest in land may preserve and keep effective the interest
by filing for record during the forty (40) year period immediately following the
effective date of the root of title of the person whose record title would otherwise
be marketable, a notice in writing, verified by oath, setting forth the nature of the
claim. A disability or lack of knowledge of any kind on the part of anyone shall
not suspend the running of the forty (40) year period. Notice may be filed for
record by the claimant or by a person acting on behalf of any claimant who is:
(a) Under a disability;
(b) Unable to assert a claim on his or her own behalf; or
(c) One (1) of a class whose identity cannot be established or is uncertain at the
time of filing the notice of claim of record.
(2) If the same record owner of any possessory interest in land has been in
possession of the land continuously for a period of at least forty (40) years,
during which period:
(a) No title transaction with respect to the interest appears of record in the
record owner's chain of title;
(b) No notice has been filed by the record owner or on behalf of the record
owner provided in subsection (1) of this section; and
(c) Possession continues to the time when marketability is being determined;
the period of possession is considered equivalent to the filing of the notice
immediately preceding the termination of the forty (40) year period described in
subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 5 of 8
HB025610.100 - 854 - XXXX 2/20/2025 2:36 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 256/GA
(1) To be effective and entitled to be recorded, the notice under Section 5 of this Act
shall:
(a) Be in the form of an affidavit;
(b) State the nature of the claim to be preserved and the names and addresses
of the persons for whose benefit the notice is being filed;
(c) Contain an accurate and full description of all land affected by the notice in
specific terms and not by general inclusions, except that if the claim is
founded upon a recorded instrument, then the description in the notice may
be the same as that contained in the recorded instrument;
(d) State the name of each record owner of the land affected by the notice, at
the time of the recording, together with the recording information of the
instrument by which each record owner acquired title to the land;
(e) Be made by any person who has knowledge of the relevant facts or is
competent to testify concerning the facts in court; and
(f) Be filed of record in the office of the county clerk in the county or counties
where the land described is located.
(2) The county clerk shall:
(a) Accept for filing all notices presented to the clerk that describe the land
located in the county that the clerk serves;
(b) Enter and record complete copies of the notice in the same way that deeds
are recorded under the names of the claimants appearing in the notice and
under the names of the record owners appearing in the notice; and
(c) Charge the same fees for recording the notice as are charged for recording
a deed as provided under KRS 64.012.
(3) A notice prepared, executed, and recorded in conformity with the requirements of
this section, or a certified copy of the notice, shall be accepted as evidence of the
facts stated to the extent they affect title to the land affected by the notice.
Page 6 of 8
HB025610.100 - 854 - XXXX 2/20/2025 2:36 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 256/GA
(4) Any person who knowingly makes any false statement in a notice executed under
this section shall be guilty of perjury under KRS Chapter 523.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The provisions of Sections 1 to 9 shall not be applied to bar or extinguish any:
(1) Lessor or the lessor's successor as a reversioner of the lessor's right of possession
on the expiration of any lease, or any lessee or the lessee's successor of the
lessee's rights in and to any lease, except as may be permitted under Section 9 of
this Act;
(2) Easement or interest in the nature of an easement created or held for any
railroad or public utility purpose;
(3) Easement or interest in the nature of an easement, the existence of which is
clearly observable by physical evidence of its use;
(4) Easement or interest in the nature of an easement, or any rights appurtenant to
an easement granted, excepted, or reserved by the instrument creating the
easement or interest, including any right for future use, if the existence of the
easement or interest is evidenced by the location beneath, upon, or above any part
of the land described in the instrument of any pipe, valve, road, wire, cable,
conduit, duct, sewer, track, pole, tower, or other physical facility and whether or
not the existence of the facility is observable;
(5) Right, title, estate, or interest in a mineral interest, mineral estate, or mineral, and
any mining or other rights pertinent to or exercisable in connection with any
right, title, estate, or interest in a mineral interest, mineral estate, or mineral;
(6) Mortgage recorded in conformity with KRS 382.110;
(7) Right, title, or interest of the United States, of this state, or of any political
subdivision, body politic, or agency of the United States or this state; or
(8) Plats, covenants, conditions, or restrictions applicable to a development, planned
Page 7 of 8
HB025610.100 - 854 - XXXX 2/20/2025 2:36 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 256/GA
community, subdivision, condominium property regime, or owners' associations,
provided the plats, covenants, conditions, or restrictions are otherwise
enforceable.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Nothing contained in Sections 1 to 9 of this Act shall be construed to extend the period
of time for the bringing of an action or for the performance of any other required act
under any statutes of limitations or, except as provided in Sections 1 to 9 of this Act, to
affect the operation of any statutes governing the effect of the recording of or the
failure to record any instrument affecting land.
SECTION 9. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1 to 9 of this Act shall be liberally construed to effect the purpose of
simplifying and facilitating land title transactions by allowing persons to rely on a
record chain of title as described in Section 2 of this Act, subject only to the limitations
in Section 3 of this Act.
Page 8 of 8
HB025610.100 - 854 - XXXX 2/20/2025 2:36 PM GA